test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     waabooz: waabooz
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1waabooz: niwaabooz
     +Px2waabooz: giwaabooz
     +Px3waabooz: owaabooz
     +PxIndefwaabooz: iwaabooz
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     waabooz+Dim: waaboozens
     waabooz+Con: waaboozenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     waabooz+Pos: waaboozim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     waabooz+Pej: waaboozish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     waabooz+Pos1Pl: waaboozinaan
     waabooz+PosPl: waabooziwaa
     waabooz+PosObv: waaboozini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     waabooz+Pret: waabooziban
     waabooz+VocPl: waabooz***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     waabooz+Obv: waaboozan
     waabooz+Pl: waaboozag
     waabooz+Loc: waaboozing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1waabooz+Dim: niwaaboozens
     +Px1waabooz+Con: niwaaboozenh
     +Px2waabooz+Dim: giwaaboozens
     +Px2waabooz+Con: giwaaboozenh
     +Px3waabooz+Dim: owaaboozens
     +Px3waabooz+Con: owaaboozenh
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim: iwaaboozens
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con: iwaaboozenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1waabooz+Pos: niwaaboozim
     +Px2waabooz+Pos: giwaaboozim
     +Px3waabooz+Pos: owaaboozim
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos: iwaaboozim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1waabooz+Pej: niwaaboozish
     +Px2waabooz+Pej: giwaaboozish
     +Px3waabooz+Pej: owaaboozish
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pej: iwaaboozish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1waabooz+Pos1Pl: niwaaboozinaan
     +Px1waabooz+PosPl: niwaabooziwaa
     +Px1waabooz+PosObv: niwaaboozini
     +Px2waabooz+Pos1Pl: giwaaboozinaan
     +Px2waabooz+PosPl: giwaabooziwaa
     +Px2waabooz+PosObv: giwaaboozini
     +Px3waabooz+Pos1Pl: owaaboozinaan
     +Px3waabooz+PosPl: owaabooziwaa
     +Px3waabooz+PosObv: owaaboozini
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos1Pl: iwaaboozinaan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+PosPl: iwaabooziwaa
     +PxIndefwaabooz+PosObv: iwaaboozini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1waabooz+Pret: niwaabooziban
     +Px1waabooz+VocPl: niwaabooz***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Pret: giwaabooziban
     +Px2waabooz+VocPl: giwaabooz***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Pret: owaabooziban
     +Px3waabooz+VocPl: owaabooz***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pret: iwaabooziban
     +PxIndefwaabooz+VocPl: iwaabooz***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1waabooz+Obv: niwaaboozan
     +Px1waabooz+Pl: niwaaboozag
     +Px1waabooz+Loc: niwaaboozing
     +Px2waabooz+Obv: giwaaboozan
     +Px2waabooz+Pl: giwaaboozag
     +Px2waabooz+Loc: giwaaboozing
     +Px3waabooz+Obv: owaaboozan
     +Px3waabooz+Pl: owaaboozag
     +Px3waabooz+Loc: owaaboozing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Obv: iwaaboozan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pl: iwaaboozag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Loc: iwaaboozing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     waabooz+Dim+Pos: waaboozensim
     waabooz+Con+Pos: waaboozenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     waabooz+Dim+Pej: waaboozensish
     waabooz+Con+Pej: waaboozenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl: waaboozensinaan
     waabooz+Dim+PosPl: waaboozensiwaa
     waabooz+Dim+PosObv: waaboozensini
     waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl: waaboozenhinaan
     waabooz+Con+PosPl: waaboozenhiwaa
     waabooz+Con+PosObv: waaboozenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     waabooz+Dim+Pret: waaboozensiban
     waabooz+Dim+VocPl: waaboozens***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pret: waaboozenhiban
     waabooz+Con+VocPl: waaboozenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Obv: waaboozensan
     waabooz+Dim+Pl: waaboozensag
     waabooz+Dim+Loc: waaboozensing
     waabooz+Con+Obv: waaboozenhan
     waabooz+Con+Pl: waaboozenhag
     waabooz+Con+Loc: waaboozenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     waabooz+Pos+Pej: waaboozimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl: waabooziminaan
     waabooz+Pos+PosPl: waaboozimiwaa
     waabooz+Pos+PosObv: waaboozimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     waabooz+Pos+Pret: waaboozimiban
     waabooz+Pos+VocPl: waaboozim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     waabooz+Pos+Obv: waabooziman
     waabooz+Pos+Pl: waaboozimag
     waabooz+Pos+Loc: waabooziming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl: waaboozishinaan
     waabooz+Pej+PosPl: waaboozishiwaa
     waabooz+Pej+PosObv: waaboozishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     waabooz+Pej+Pret: waaboozishiban
     waabooz+Pej+VocPl: waaboozish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     waabooz+Pej+Obv: waaboozishan
     waabooz+Pej+Pl: waaboozishag
     waabooz+Pej+Loc: waaboozishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     waabooz+Pos1Pl+Pret: waaboozinaaniban
     waabooz+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waaboozinaan***idig, idog***
     waabooz+PosPl+Pret: waabooziwaaiban
     waabooz+PosPl+VocPl: waabooziwaa***idig, idog***
     waabooz+PosObv+Pret: waabooziniiban
     waabooz+PosObv+VocPl: waaboozini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     waabooz+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozinaanan
     waabooz+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozinaanag
     waabooz+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozinaaning
     waabooz+PosPl+Obv: waabooziwaaan
     waabooz+PosPl+Pl: waabooziwaaag
     waabooz+PosPl+Loc: waabooziwaaing
     waabooz+PosObv+Obv: waaboozinian
     waabooz+PosObv+Pl: waabooziniag
     waabooz+PosObv+Loc: waabooziniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     waabooz+Pret+Obv: waaboozibanan
     waabooz+Pret+Pl: waaboozibanag
     waabooz+Pret+Loc: waaboozibaning
     waabooz+VocPl+Obv: waabooz***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+VocPl+Pl: waabooz***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+VocPl+Loc: waabooz***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos: niwaaboozensim
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos: niwaaboozenhim
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos: giwaaboozensim
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos: giwaaboozenhim
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos: owaaboozensim
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos: owaaboozenhim
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos: iwaaboozensim
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos: iwaaboozenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pej: niwaaboozensish
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pej: niwaaboozenhish
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pej: giwaaboozensish
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pej: giwaaboozenhish
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pej: owaaboozensish
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pej: owaaboozenhish
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pej: iwaaboozensish
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pej: iwaaboozenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl: niwaaboozensinaan
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+PosPl: niwaaboozensiwaa
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+PosObv: niwaaboozensini
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl: niwaaboozenhinaan
     +Px1waabooz+Con+PosPl: niwaaboozenhiwaa
     +Px1waabooz+Con+PosObv: niwaaboozenhini
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl: giwaaboozensinaan
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+PosPl: giwaaboozensiwaa
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+PosObv: giwaaboozensini
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl: giwaaboozenhinaan
     +Px2waabooz+Con+PosPl: giwaaboozenhiwaa
     +Px2waabooz+Con+PosObv: giwaaboozenhini
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl: owaaboozensinaan
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+PosPl: owaaboozensiwaa
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+PosObv: owaaboozensini
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl: owaaboozenhinaan
     +Px3waabooz+Con+PosPl: owaaboozenhiwaa
     +Px3waabooz+Con+PosObv: owaaboozenhini
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl: iwaaboozensinaan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+PosPl: iwaaboozensiwaa
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+PosObv: iwaaboozensini
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos1Pl: iwaaboozenhinaan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+PosPl: iwaaboozenhiwaa
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+PosObv: iwaaboozenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pret: niwaaboozensiban
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+VocPl: niwaaboozens***idig, idog***
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pret: niwaaboozenhiban
     +Px1waabooz+Con+VocPl: niwaaboozenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pret: giwaaboozensiban
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+VocPl: giwaaboozens***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pret: giwaaboozenhiban
     +Px2waabooz+Con+VocPl: giwaaboozenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pret: owaaboozensiban
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+VocPl: owaaboozens***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pret: owaaboozenhiban
     +Px3waabooz+Con+VocPl: owaaboozenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pret: iwaaboozensiban
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+VocPl: iwaaboozens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pret: iwaaboozenhiban
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+VocPl: iwaaboozenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Obv: niwaaboozensan
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pl: niwaaboozensag
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Loc: niwaaboozensing
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Obv: niwaaboozenhan
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pl: niwaaboozenhag
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Loc: niwaaboozenhing
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Obv: giwaaboozensan
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pl: giwaaboozensag
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Loc: giwaaboozensing
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Obv: giwaaboozenhan
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pl: giwaaboozenhag
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Loc: giwaaboozenhing
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Obv: owaaboozensan
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pl: owaaboozensag
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Loc: owaaboozensing
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Obv: owaaboozenhan
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pl: owaaboozenhag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Loc: owaaboozenhing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Obv: iwaaboozensan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pl: iwaaboozensag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Loc: iwaaboozensing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Obv: iwaaboozenhan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pl: iwaaboozenhag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Loc: iwaaboozenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+Pej: niwaaboozimish
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+Pej: giwaaboozimish
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+Pej: owaaboozimish
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+Pej: iwaaboozimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl: niwaabooziminaan
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+PosPl: niwaaboozimiwaa
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+PosObv: niwaaboozimini
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl: giwaabooziminaan
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+PosPl: giwaaboozimiwaa
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+PosObv: giwaaboozimini
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl: owaabooziminaan
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+PosPl: owaaboozimiwaa
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+PosObv: owaaboozimini
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl: iwaabooziminaan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+PosPl: iwaaboozimiwaa
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+PosObv: iwaaboozimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+Pret: niwaaboozimiban
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+VocPl: niwaaboozim***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+Pret: giwaaboozimiban
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+VocPl: giwaaboozim***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+Pret: owaaboozimiban
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+VocPl: owaaboozim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+Pret: iwaaboozimiban
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+VocPl: iwaaboozim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+Obv: niwaabooziman
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+Pl: niwaaboozimag
     +Px1waabooz+Pos+Loc: niwaabooziming
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+Obv: giwaabooziman
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+Pl: giwaaboozimag
     +Px2waabooz+Pos+Loc: giwaabooziming
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+Obv: owaabooziman
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+Pl: owaaboozimag
     +Px3waabooz+Pos+Loc: owaabooziming
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+Obv: iwaabooziman
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+Pl: iwaaboozimag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Pos+Loc: iwaabooziming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl: niwaaboozishinaan
     +Px1waabooz+Pej+PosPl: niwaaboozishiwaa
     +Px1waabooz+Pej+PosObv: niwaaboozishini
     +Px2waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl: giwaaboozishinaan
     +Px2waabooz+Pej+PosPl: giwaaboozishiwaa
     +Px2waabooz+Pej+PosObv: giwaaboozishini
     +Px3waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl: owaaboozishinaan
     +Px3waabooz+Pej+PosPl: owaaboozishiwaa
     +Px3waabooz+Pej+PosObv: owaaboozishini
